Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Crossroads
Sound and Screen Act".
Req. No. 12841 Page 1

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5500 of Title 68, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this act:
1. "Qualified production" means music content created in whole
or in part within the State of Oklahoma, including music albums,
sound recordings, and original scores or soundtracks for motion
pictures, television, gaming, and digital multimedia;
2. "Qualified production company" means a natural person,
general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability
partnership, limited liability limited partnership, limited
liability company, corporation, trust, estate or any other lawfully
recognized entity engaged in producing a qualified production;
3. "Qualified production facility" means a building or
buildings in which music is intended to be regularly produced within
the State of Oklahoma, containing:
a. indoor, climate-controlled storage for materials
anticipated to be used or are being used for qualified
productions, and
b. at least three (3) indoor, fully insulated, climate-
controlled, and soundproof recording or scoring
studios or sound stages, and sufficient electrical
service so as to not need generators for ordinary
operation.
Req. No. 12841 Page 2

B. 1. A qualified production company shall be entitled to a
rebate for ten percent (10%) of the costs incurred for the use of a
qualified production facility for the creation of a qualified
production, provided that the costs are less than Twenty Thousand
Dollars ($20,000.00). A qualified production company shall be
entitled to a rebate for twenty-five percent (25%) of the costs
incurred for the use of a qualified production facility for the
creation of a qualified production, provided that the costs are
equal to or exceed Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00).
2. In addition to the rebate provided by paragraph 1 of this
subsection, a qualified production company shall be entitled to an
additional five percent (5%) rebate if at least fifty percent (50%)
of the qualified production's musicians, artists, producers, or
engineers are Oklahoma-based.
3. In addition to the rebate provided by paragraph 1 of this
subsection, a qualified production company shall be entitled to an
additional two percent (2%) rebate if the scoring, recording,
mixing, and all other music related work for a qualified production
is completed in the State of Oklahoma.
4. In addition to the rebate provided by paragraph 1 of this
subsection, a qualified production company shall be entitled to an
additional seven percent (7%) rebate if a qualified production
company, during the recording or production period, performs a

Req. No. 12841 Page 3

publ ic, ticketed concert in Oklahoma that meets the following
criteria:
a. the venue has a minimum capacity of five hundred
(500), or two hundred fifty (250), if in a rural area,
b. the performance is ticketed or part of an established
festival or event, and
c. there is public promotion for the concert.
In addition to the rebate provided for by this paragraph, the
qualified production company shall be entitled to addition two
percent (2%) rebate if the concert features an Oklahoma-based
opening act.
C. No qualified production company shall receive more than Five
Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) in rebates for a single
qualified production.
D. No rebate provided for in subsection B shall be available
after the first Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) are expended
each year.
E. The Oklahoma Department of Commerce and the Oklahoma Tax
Commission shall administer the rebate program. The Oklahoma
Department of Commerce, the Oklahoma Tax Commission, and the
Oklahoma Film and Music Office may promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this act.
F. To be eligible for a rebate payment a qualified production
company shall:
Req. No. 12841 Page 4

1. Submit an application and documentation to the Oklahoma
Department of Commerce as required by the Department;
2. Have filed any Oklahoma tax returns and tax documents
required by law;
3. Provide evidence that all Oklahoma crew and local vendors
have been paid and that there are no pending liens against the
production company in this state;
4. Provide evidence of financing for production prior to the
commencement of principal photography;
5. Provide evidence of a certificate of general liability
insurance with a minimum coverage of One Million Dollars
($1,000,000.00) and a workers' compensation policy in compliance
with law, which shall include coverage of employer's liability; and
6. Provide evidence, as required by the Department, that the
projects pursuant to this act are completed.
G. The Department of Commerce shall approve or disapprove all
claims for rebate and shall notify the Tax Commission subject to the
limitations set forth in this act. Upon notification of approval
from the Department, the Commission shall issue payment for all
approved claims from funds held in the Crossroads Sound and Screen
Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 2 of this act and subject
to the limitations set forth in Section 1 of this act. If the
amount of approved claims exceeds the balance of the revolving fund,
payments shall be made in the order the claims are approved by the
Req. No. 12841 Page 5

Depa rtment. If an approved claim is not paid in whole, the unpaid
claim or unpaid portion of the claim shall be paid upon the
availability of funds.
H. Any qualified production company receiving a rebate under
this act shall agree to participate in a minimum of three (3)
promotional efforts, which may include social media, press
interviews, event appearances, or other state-approved promotional
activities, and allow the Oklahoma Film and Music Office to include
their production in statewide marketing campaigns. Recipients of
any rebate under this act may be asked to participate in local
workshops, artist residences, or community events to foster
Oklahoma's growing music and film ecosystem.
I. Any qualified production company receiving a rebate under
this act that creates a qualified production that is shown through
film, television, or digital media shall provide on-screen credit
acknowledging the State of Oklahoma's contribution.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5501 of Title 68, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Oklahoma Tax Commission to be designated the "Crossroads
Sound and Screen Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing
fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of
all monies received by the Tax Commission which are specifically
Req. No. 12841 Page 6

requ ired by law to be deposited in the fund, any public or private
donations, contributions, and gifts received for the benefit of the
fund and any amounts appropriated by the Oklahoma Legislature. All
monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated
and may be budgeted and expended by the Tax Commission for the
purpose of paying rebates as provided in this act. Expenditures
from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State
Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the
Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for
approval and payment.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12841 AO 02/21/25











Req. No. 12841 Page 7